Tennessee, session 114, HB0648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-28-107(a), is amended by adding
the following language as a new subdivision (4):
(4) For properties that contain five (5) or more dwelling units, a landlord may
submit one (1) form for the entire property if all the required information is the same for
all the dwelling units on the same property.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-28-107, is amended by deleting
subsection (c) and substituting:
(c)
(1) This section applies to a municipal, metropolitan, or county
government that adopts this section by passage of an ordinance or resolution.
The ordinance or resolution must specify the types of dwelling units that require
registration and set the amount of the fee, not to exceed the amount specified in
subdivision (a)(2).
(2) A local government that is subject to this section on or before June
30, 2025, is not required to pass an ordinance or resolution pursuant to
subdivision (c)(1).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect on July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0648
001756
- 1 -